Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.040

Water redemption fund—Creation.

The city or town council before issuing water redemption bonds shall by ordinance establish a fund for the payment of the bonds at maturity and of interest thereon as it matures to be designated the water redemption fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.89.040. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 4; RRS s 9154-4.]